Utah statutes.
53B-15-106.   Personnel information.

Upon written request of the state college, university, or board, persons with access to personnel information regarding public employees shall disclose the mailing address of individuals who have defaulted under Section 53B-15-102 and who are current public employees for use by the college, university, or board in locating those individuals to collect student loan obligations.

